Hawaii statutes.
§463E-3 Qualification for licensure.
No person shall be licensed to practice podiatric medicine unless the person
has passed the examinations described in section 463E-4 and has been found to possess
the necessary qualifications as required by the board.

Before any applicant shall be eligible for licensure,
the applicant shall furnish satisfactory proof to the board that:

(1) The applicant is a graduate in podiatric medicine
of a college approved by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education of the American
Podiatric Medical Association and by the Hawaii medical board; and

(2) The applicant has completed at least twenty-four
months in an accredited podiatric residency, as approved by the Council on
Podiatric Medical Education, prior to applying for licensure; provided that an
applicant who has graduated from an approved college before January 1, 2004,
shall:

(A) Have completed at least twelve months in
an accredited podiatric residency;

(B) Have at least ten years of active
licensed experience in podiatric medicine in another state; and

(C) Hold a current, unencumbered license in
podiatric medicine in another state;

provided further that the residency and active
licensed experience requirements in this paragraph shall not apply to
podiatrists with current, active licenses to practice podiatric medicine in
Hawaii. [L 1973, c 80, pt of §1; am L 1985, c 125, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1986,
c 273, §1; am L 1989, c 240, §3; am L 2008, c 9, §3; am L 2014, c 63, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next